Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1106
Community work release and reentry centers; standards; requirements.

The department shall set standards for the appropriate staffing levels of community work release and reentry centers. The department shall require each center to:

(1) Be under the supervision and control of a designated center director approved by the department;

(2) Be adequately staffed twenty-four hours per day, including on weekends and holidays; and

(3) Assign an individual counselor to each committed offender assigned to the center.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 63.